Illinois, session 104th, SB3971.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 7for grants for the establishment of hydroponic agriculture 8facilities in existing vacant commercial buildings 9prioritizing those proposed facilities that are in or adjacent 10to areas designated as food deserts in the State and areas of 11significant vacant developed commercial space. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132026.